dev/guesser/guesser.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!       М О Р Ф О Л О Г И Ч Е С К И Й · Т Р А Н С Д У К Т О Р · Д Л Я       !!
!!                       Я К У Т С К О Г О · Я З Ы К А                       !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols 

%<n%>              ! Имя существительное
%<adj%>            ! Имя прилагательное
%<np%>             ! 
%<cnjcoo%>         ! 
%<post%>           ! 
%<det%>            ! 
%<adv%>            ! 
%<postadv%>        !
%<vaux%>           ! 
%<ij%>             ! 
%<cnjadv%>         !
%<cnjsub%>         ! Подчинительный союз; Sub-ordinating conjunction
%<num%>            ! Число
%<prn%>            ! Местоимение
%<v%>              ! Глагол
%<abbr%>           ! 
%<qst%>            ! 
%<cop%>            ! 
%<coop%>           ! Cooperative
%<pass%>           ! Passive

%<p1%>             ! 1. лицо
%<p2%>             ! 2. лицо
%<p3%>             ! 3. лицо

%<hu%>             !
 
%<sg%>             ! Единственное число
%<du%>             !
%<pl%>             ! Множественное число

%<iv%>             ! 
%<tv%>             ! 

%<nom%>            ! Именительный падеж
%<par%>            !
%<dat%>            !
%<acc%>            !
%<abl%>            !
%<ins%>            !
%<com%>            !
%<comp%>           !
%<loc%>            ! FIXME: check

%<px1sg%>          !
%<px2sg%>          !
%<px3sp%>          !
%<px1pl%>          !
%<px2pl%>          !
%<px3pl%>          !

%<subst%>          !
%<attr%>           !

%<neg%>            !

%<pers%>           !
%<dem%>            !
%<ind%>            !
%<itg%>            !
%<qnt%>            ! Quantifier
%<ord%>            !
%<coll%>           !

%<ant%>            !
%<pat%>            !
%<cog%>            !
%<top%>            !
%<al%>             !
%<org%>            !

%<f%>              !
%<m%>              !

%<evid%>           ! Evidential, a.k.a. "indirect" / non-eyewitness / hearsay
%<aor%>            !
%<ifi%>            !
%<past%>           !
%<imp%>            !
%<pros%>           !
%<epis%>           !
%<resl%>           !
%<nec%>            !	

%<gna_perf%>       ! 
%<gna_cond%>       ! 
%<gna_abes%>       ! 
%<gna_caus%>       ! -BIччI
%<gna_goal%>       ! -AAрI
%<gna_nond%>       ! -A илик

%<ger_pros%>       ! -IEх
%<ger_aor%>        ! -Ar

%<gpr_aor%>        ! 

%<prc_aor%>        ! 
%<prc_impf%>       ! 

%<qst%>            !
%<mod_ass%>        !

%<sent%>           ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>           ! Дефиз 
%<cm%>             ! 
%<apos%>           ! 
%<rquot%>          ! 
%<lquot%>          ! 
%<rpar%>           ! 
%<lpar%>           ! 


%{L%}              !
%{G%}              !
%{T%}              !
%{B%}              !
%{A%}              !
%{I%}              !
%{n%}              !
%{t%}              !
%{i%}              !
%{y%}              !
%{a%}              ! 
%{р%}              ! 
%{рл%}             ! р except before л, then л
%{D%}              ! д/т alternation at the end of some verbs (cf. тарт)
%{н%}              ! Reflexive н that deletes before passive
%{й%}              ! Verb-stem-final й that deletes before passive
%{ь%}              ! Disappearing ь

%{☭%}              ! Used to tell the phonology about a Russian word
%{ъ%}              ! 

%                  !
%-                 !
%>                 ! Граница морфемы


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Guesser ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT-EMPH 

# ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP 

%+дуо%<qst%>:%>% дуо # ;
%+ини%<mod_ass%>:%>% ини # ;
%+дии%<mod_ass%>:%>% дии # ;
%+ээ%<mod_ass%>:%>% ээ # ;

# ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP 

# ;

LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<par%>:%>%{T%}%{A%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{n%}%{I%} # ;
%<abl%>:%>%{t%}т%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{i%}н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-POSS-3SP

%<par%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}р # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<abl%>:%>тт%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>н%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>н%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-POSS-12SG

%<par%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>н # ;
%<abl%>:%>тт%{A%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;
%<com%>:%>н%{I%}н # ;
%<comp%>:%>н%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{A%}р # ;

LEXICON CASES-NOM

%<nom%>: # ; 

!LEXICON POSS-JNW
!
!CASES-ETC ;
!%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}%{М%}%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}%{Ҥ%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т%{ы%} CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{ы%} CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-OBL

CASES-ETC ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{B%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-12SG ;
%<px1sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}р # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-12SG ;
%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}р # ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т%{I%} CASES-POSS-3SP ;
!%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%} CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-NOM

CASES-ETC ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-NOM ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ҥ CASES-NOM ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{B%}%{I%}т CASES-NOM ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}т CASES-NOM ;
!%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{A%} CASES-NOM ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST 

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES-NOM ;
%<subst%>: CASES-OBL ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-NOM ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-OBL ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC

%<loc%>:%>%{T%}%{A%}%{A%}ҕ%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ; ! FIXME: check

LEXICON CASES-ETC

! CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-NOM ;
POSS-OBL ;
!POSS-JNW ;
CASES-NOM ;
CASES-OBL ;
! ABESS ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

SUBST ;

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{t%}%{A%} CASES-NOM ;
:%>%{t%}%{I%} CASES-OBL ;

POSS-NOM ; 
POSS-OBL ; 
!POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
!                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis



LEXICON N5 

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%{☭%} SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON 

CASES-NOM ; 
CASES-OBL ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M 

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;               

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

:%{☭%} NP-TOP ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<org%>: GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<al%>: GENPOSS-ETC ; 


LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: #  ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON Nouns 
малахит:малахит N1 ; ! "малахит"
хаас:хаас N1 ; ! "гусь"
адаар:адаар N1 ; ! "gnarl, knot, burl"
быттык:быттык N1 ; ! "groin"
өй:өй N1 ; ! "mind, intellect, intelligence;"
эртэбэс:эртэбэс N1 ; ! "boot"
декан:декан N5 ; ! ""
барс:барс N5 ; ! "барс"
быһыы% биэрии:быһыы% биэрии N1 ; ! ""
мечеть:мечеть N5 ; ! ""
страховка:страховка N5 ; ! ""
пуонд:пуонд N5 ; ! "фонд"
урааҥхай:урааҥхай N1 ; ! ""
методист:методист N5 ; ! ""
герб:герб N5 ; ! ""
экватор:экватор N5 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Ньургун:Ньургун NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Кыдаана:Кыдаана NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Туйаара:Туйаара NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Рустам:Рустам NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Галина:Галина NP-ANT-F; ! "Galıyna" 
Ева:Ева NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Иван:Иван NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Клавдия:Клавдия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Аксинья:Аксинья NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Розалия:Розалия NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Карл:Карл NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Чингиз:Чингиз NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Логин:Логин NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Эрилик:Эрилик NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Игидэй:Игидэй NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Лорен:Лорен NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Апексимович:Апексимо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Владимирович:Владимиро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Давидович:Давидо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Егорович:Егоро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Ионович:Ионо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Константинович:Константино NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Осипович:Осипо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Терентьевич:Терентье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Егоров:Егоров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кондаков:Кондаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кириллин:Кириллин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Томскай:Томскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Пекарскай:Пекарскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Башарин:Башарин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
де% Кубертен:де% Кубертен NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Донской:Донской NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Эверстов:Эверстов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Коркин:Коркин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ярославскай:Ярославскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Лебедев:Лебедев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Уткин:Уткин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Шадрин:Шадрин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Колчак:Колчак NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Такыров:Такыров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кардашевскай:Кардашевскай NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Кушнарев:Кушнарев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Бытаһыттыҥы:Бытаһыттыҥы NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Шишигин:Шишигин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Головин:Головин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Черчилль:Черчилль NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Пекарский:Пекарский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Окороков:Окороков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Кинг:Кинг NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Бравин:Бравин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Буш:Буш NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Бхатт:Бхатт NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Байкалов:Байкалов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Шарин:Шарин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Санкт%-Петербуург:Санкт%-Петербур NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
Санкт%-Петербуург:Санкт% Петербург NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
Сталинград:Сталинград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Париж:Париж NP-TOP-RUS ; ! "Paris"
Эуропа% Холбоһуга:Эуропа% Холбоһук NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! ""
Белоруссия:Белоруссия NP-TOP ; ! ""
Таатта:Таатта NP-TOP ; ! ""
Винница:Винница NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мүрү:Мүрү NP-TOP ; ! ""
ЯАССР:ЯАССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
АХШ:АХШ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
США:США NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Баден:Баден NP-TOP ; ! ""
Уфа:Уфа NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сыырдаах:Сыырдаах NP-TOP ; ! ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
КР:КР NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! "Казахстан Республиката"
РС%(Я%):РС%(Я%) NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Якутская% АССР:Якутская% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Чуваш% АССР:Чуваш% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Тыва% АССР:Тыва% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Татар% АССР:Татар% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Бурят% АССР:Бурят% АССР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
РСФСР:РСФСР NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
СГУ:СГУ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! FIXME: check university = org?
Сахазернопродукт:Сахазернопродукт NP-ORG ; ! ""
Сахафильм:Сахафильм NP-ORG ; ! ""
Якутгазпром:Якутгазпром NP-ORG ; ! ""
Интерфакс:Интерфакс NP-ORG ; ! ""
АЛРОСА:АЛРОСА NP-ORG ; ! ""
Ашока:Ашока NP-ORG ; ! ""
МГУ:МГУ NP-ORG ; ! ""
Бикипиэдьийэ:Бикипиэдьийэ NP-AL ; ! ""
Сака:Сака NP-AL ; ! ""
Удачнай:Удачнай NP-AL ; ! ""
Мир:Мир NP-AL ; ! ""
Дапсы:Дапсы NP-AL ; ! ""
Сахаада:Сахаада NP-AL ; ! ""
Титаник:Титаник NP-AL ; ! ""
Киров:Киров NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Волгоград:Волгоград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Беларусь:Беларусь NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives
уопсай:уопсай A1 ; ! "общий"
тутулуктаах:тутулуктаах A1 ; ! ""
туһалаах:туһалаах  A1 ; ! " beneficial"
хара:хара  A1 ; ! " black;"
бүтэһик:бүтэһик A1 ; ! "последний" - check
урукку:урукку A1 ; ! ""
дьыалалаах:дьыалалаах A1 ; ! "находящийся под судом или следствием; разг. имеющий дело"
